cs: Typ vlhkoměru: Analogové; Kombinovaný (analogový a digitální); Digitální; Bez vlhkoměru; Chytrý/připojený; Jiné
zh-CN: 湿度计类型: 指针式; 组合式（指针和数字）; 数字式; 无; 智能/联网; 其他
ja: 湿度計のタイプ: アナログ; コンボ（アナログとデジタル）; デジタル; なし; スマート/コネクテッド; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta vlagomjera: Analogni; Kombinirani (analogni i digitalni); Digitalni; Nema; Pametno/povezano; Ostalo
de: Hygrometertyp: Analog; Kombination (analog und digital); Digital; Keine; Smart/vernetzt; Sonstiges
vi: Loại ẩm kế: Analog; Kết hợp (cơ và kỹ thuật số); Kỹ thuật số; Không có; Thông minh/có kết nối; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul higrometrului: Analogic; Combinat (analogic și digital); Digital; Niciuna; Inteligent/conectat; Altele
hu: Higrométer típusa: Analóg; Kombinált (analóg és digitális); Digitális; Egyik sem; Okos hálózathoz csatlakoztatott; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ vlhkomeru: Analógový; Kombinácia (analógový a digitálny); Digitálny; Žiadny; Inteligentný/pripojený; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de higrómetro: Analógico; Combinação (analógico e digital); Digital; Nenhum; Inteligente/conectado; Outro
es: Tipo de higrómetro: Analógico; Combo (analógico y digital); Digital; Ninguno; Inteligente/conectado; Otros
pl: Typ higrometru: Analogowe; Kombinowany (analogowy i cyfrowy); Cyfrowe; Brak; Smart / z łącznością; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Higrometro tipas: Analoginis; Kombinuotas (analoginis ir skaitmeninis); Skaitmeninis; Nėra; Išmanus/prijungtas prie interneto; Kita
bg-BG: Тип хигрометър: Аналогов; Комбинирано (аналогово и цифрово); Дигитален; Няма; Смарт/свързани; Друго
el: Τύπος υγρόμετρου: Αναλογικό; Συνδυασμός (αναλογικός και ψηφιακός); Ψηφιακό; Κανένα; Έξυπνο/συνδεδεμένο; Άλλο
it: Tipo di igrometro: Analog; Combo (analogico e digitale); Digitale; Nessuna; Intelligente/connesso; Altro
ko: 습도계 유형: 아날로그; 콤보(아날로그 및 디지털); 디지털; 없음; 스마트/연결형; 기타
ru: Тип гигрометра: Аналоговый; Комбинированный (аналоговый и цифровой); Цифровой; Нет; С умным подключением; Другой
nl: Type hygrometer: Analoog; Combinatie (analoog en digitaal); Digitaal; Geen; Slim/verbonden; Overig
zh-TW: 濕度計類型: 類比; 組合式 (類比和數位); 數位; 無; 智慧/連線; 其他
fr: Type d’hygromètre: Analogique; Combiné (analogique et numérique); Numérique; Aucune; Intelligent/connecté; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de higrômetro: Analógico; Combinação (analógica e digital); Digital; Nenhum; Inteligente/conectado; Outro
nb: Hygrometertype: Analog; Kombinasjon (analog og digital); Digital; Ingen; Smart/tilkoblet; Annet
fi: Kosteusmittarin tyyppi: Analoginen; Yhdistelmä (analoginen ja digitaalinen); Digitaalinen; Ei mikään; Älykäs/liitetty; Muu
en: Hygrometer type: Analog; Combo (analog and digital); Digital; None; Smart/connected; Other
sv: Hygrometertyp: Analog; Kombination (analog och digital); Digital; Inga; Smart/uppkopplad; Övrigt
th: ประเภทของไฮโกรมิเตอร์: อนาล็อก; แบบผสม (แอนะล็อกและดิจิทัล); ดิจิทัล; ไม่มี; แบบสมาร์ท/เชื่อมต่อได้; อื่นๆ
tr: Higrometre tipi: Analog; Karma (analog ve dijital); Dijital; Yok; Akıllı/bağlantılı; Diğer
da: Hygrometertype: Analog; Kombination (analog og digital); Digital; Ingen; Smart/forbundet; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta higrometra: Analogno; Kombinacija (analogna in digitalna); Digitalno; Brez; Pametno/povezano; Druga